Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2276.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2276.1. A. There is hereby created a trust fund to be
known as the “Oklahoma State Park Trust Fund”. The Oklahoma Tourism
and Recreation Commission shall be the trustees of the Trust Fund
trust fund.
B. 1. The Commission may utilize five percent (5%) of the
principal of the Trust Fund trust fund annually to:
a. protect and conserve state park lands, but shall not
include routine maintenance expenses of the state
parks,
b. preserve historic properties under the jurisdiction of
the Commission,

c. provide for one-time capital upgrades and improvements
of state park resources, and
d. pay fees and expenses associated with the services of
a custodian of the Trust Fund trust fund.
2. Beginning July 1, 2012, and ending June 30, 2020, the
Commission may utilize funds not to exceed Fifteen Million Dollars
($15,000,000.00) from the principal of the Trust Fund trust fund to
construct and maintain a lodge and any associated facilities deemed
necessary by the Commission at the Lake Murray State Park.
3. Beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2030, the
Commission may utilize funds not to exceed Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00) from the principal of the trust fund to construct
and maintain a lodge and any associated facilities deemed necessary
by the Commission.
C. The Commission shall give priority for funding to the state
park from which the revenues were initially derived.
D. The Trust Fund trust fund principal shall consist of monies
from any and all mineral lease payments, seismograph fees, royalty
payments, or other payments associated with oil and gas mineral
operations at state parks that are managed by the Oklahoma Tourism
and Recreation Department, any funds appropriated or transferred to
the Trust Fund trust fund by the Legislature, and any monies or
assets contributed to the Trust Fund trust fund from any other
source, public or private.
E. Notwithstanding other provisions of law, income and
investment return on Trust Fund trust fund principal shall accrue to
the Trust Fund trust fund for use as provided by authorization of
the trustees for the purposes listed in subsection B of this
section. Except as provided for in subsection B of this section, no
income or investment return or principal shall be used for
administrative expenses of the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department or expenses incurred by the Commission in the
administration of the Trust Fund trust fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1152 Page 2

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1152 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1152 Page 4